Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 74.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-1278
Nebraska Agricultural
Products Research Fund; created; investment.

There
is hereby created for the use of the Department of Economic Development a
fund, to be known as the Nebraska Agricultural Products Research Fund, to
consist of any funds appropriated by the Legislature and any funds received
by gift or from the federal government to be used for the purpose provided
in section 81-1279. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Nebraska Agricultural Products Research
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1959, c. 10, § 1, p. 117;

Laws 1963, c. 14, § 1, p. 92;

Laws 1965, c. 478, § 1, p. 1539;

Laws 1967, c. 11, § 1, p. 95;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 31, p. 2360;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 258;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 2-2501;

Laws 1989, LB 10, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 108;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 74.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.